Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20208-174
Records and files; destruction; applicable to national banks.

Sections 8-170 to 8-174, so far as may be permitted by the laws of the United States, shall apply to the records and files of national banks.

Laws 1949, c. 10, § 5, p. 72;

R.R.S.1943, § 8-1,115;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 74, p. 163;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 71.